District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.85

Advisory Council to the Agency.

(a)

There is established an Advisory Council to the Agency to assist and advise the Risk Officer regarding the Agency.

(b)

The Advisory Council shall consist of 7 members appointed by the Risk Officer. One member shall represent the District of Columbia Primary Care Association, 2 members shall represent District health centers, 2 members shall have expertise in general property insurance and re-insurance, and 2 members shall have general insurance expertise, whether medical malpractice or general property insurance.

(c)

The Risk Officer and the captive manager shall serve as ex officio members of the Advisory Council.

(d)

The Risk Officer shall serve as chairperson of the Advisory Council.

(e)

Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, Advisory Council members shall serve terms of 3 years. An Advisory Council member’s term shall continue until his or her successor is appointed. The Advisory Council members may be reappointed for additional terms.

(f)

The Risk Officer shall determine the terms the initial Advisory Council members shall serve. Three of the Advisory Council members shall serve terms of 2 years, 2 shall serve terms of 4 years, and 2 shall serve terms of 6 years.

(g)

Vacancies in the Advisory Council shall be filled by the Risk Officer. Advisory Council members may be removed by the Risk Officer for cause.

(h)

Advisory Council members shall not be compensated in their capacity as Advisory Council members, but shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses incurred in the necessary performance of their duties.

(i)

The Advisory Council shall:

(1)

Advise the Risk Officer in the general oversight of the Agency;

(2)

Assess the needs and interests of the health centers;

(2A)

Assess the needs and interests of the District with respect to obtaining property insurance through the Agency; and

(3)

Meet at least on an annual basis, at meetings announced by the Risk Officer.

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-196, § 6, 55 DCR 6261
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 239, 56 DCR 1117
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 1032(d), 60 DCR 12472
This section is referenced in § 1-307.81.
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in subsec. (e).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 rewrote (b); and added (i)(2A) and made a related change.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1032(d) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1032(d) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 1031 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle D of Title I of the act may be cited as the “Captive Insurance Amendment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.